Tennessee statutes. Title 30 Administration of Estates
Part 1

Allowances to Family

30-2-101. Right of surviving spouse and minor children to specific property.

The surviving spouse of an intestate decedent, or a spouse who elects against a decedent's will, is entitled to receive from the decedent's estate the following exempt property having a fair-market value (in excess of any indebtedness and other amounts secured by any security interests in the property) that does not exceed fifty thousand dollars ($50,000):

Tangible personal property normally located in, or used in or about, the principal residence of the decedent and not used primarily in a trade or business or for investment purposes, and

A motor vehicle or vehicles not used primarily in a trade or business.

If there is no surviving spouse, the decedent's unmarried minor children are entitled as tenants in common only to exempt property as described in subdivision (a)(1)(A). Rights to this exempt property are in addition to any benefit or share passing to the surviving spouse or unmarried minor children by intestate succession, elective share, homestead or year's support allowance.

Where a deceased dies intestate, leaving a surviving spouse, until letters of administration are granted, the surviving spouse may take into possession and make use of any crop then growing and of the provisions on hand as may be necessary for the support of the surviving spouse and family; the surviving spouse may also use the stock, implements and plantation utensils for the purpose of completing, securing and selling the crop.

The surviving spouse or other custodian of unmarried minor children shall apply for the property named in this section before it is distributed or sold, but the property so delivered shall in no case be liable for the payment of claims against the estate. If the surviving spouse or unmarried minor children do not receive the property allowed under this section and the property is sold by executor or administrator, the court shall order the money to be paid to the surviving spouse or unmarried minor children at any time before the money is paid out for claims or distributed.

Any action to set aside the property designated in this section shall be brought within the limits set by § 31-4-102.

Acts 1967, ch. 146, § 1; 1969, ch. 135, §§ 1, 2; T.C.A., §§ 30-801, 30-802; Acts 1985, ch. 140, § 9; 1997, ch. 426, § 3; 1999, ch. 491, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 1997, ch. 426, § 26 provided that the amendment by that act shall apply to all estates of decedents dying on or after January 1, 1998, and to all wills, other documents and proceedings related thereto.

Cross-References. Elective share of surviving spouse, title 31, chapter 4.

Jurisdiction of chancery courts of probate and related matters, title 16, chapter 16, part 2.

Textbooks. Gibson's Suits in Chancery (7th ed., Inman), § 433.

Pritchard on Wills and Administration of Estates (4th ed., Phillips and Robinson), §§ 491, 500, 631-634, 816, 943, 1076-1078.

Tennessee Forms (Robinson, Ramsey and Harwell), Nos. 4-1106, 4-1107, 4-1110.

Law Reviews.

Confused by tax reforms? Follow these 10 key rules for better estate planning in Tennessee (Dan W. Holbrook), 37 No. 8 Tenn. B.J. 12 (2001).

Inheritance and Gift Taxes — Revised (Steven A. Rajtor), 16 No. 2 Tenn. B.J. 24 (1980); 16 No. 2 Tenn. B.J. 25 (1980).

Legal Rights and Issues Surrounding Conception, Pregnancy and Birth, 39 Vand. L. Rev. 597 (1986).

Protection Against Spousal Disinheritance: A Critical Analysis of Tennessee's New Forced Share System, 28 U. Mem. L. Rev. 561 (1998).

The 1978 Tennessee Inheritance and Gift Tax Reform Act (R. Wayne Peters and Steven A. Rajtor), 14 No. 3 Tenn. B.J. 4.

Value definition clauses: Creative uses (Dan W. Holbrook), 37 No. 4 Tenn. B.J. 20 (2001).

30-2-102. Year's support allowance.

In addition to the right to homestead, an elective share under title 31, chapter 4, and exempt property, the surviving spouse of an intestate, or a surviving spouse who elects to take against a decedent's will, is entitled to a reasonable allowance in money out of the estate for such surviving spouse's maintenance during the period of one (1) year after the death of the spouse, according to the surviving spouse's previous standard of living, taking into account the condition of the estate of the deceased spouse. The court may consider the totality of the circumstances in fixing the allowance authorized by this section, including assets that may have passed to the spouse outside probate.

The allowance so ordered shall be made payable to the surviving spouse, unless the court finds that it would be just and equitable to make a division of it between the unmarried minor children. If there is no surviving spouse, the allowance shall be made to the unmarried minor children.

The court may authorize the surviving spouse to receive any personal property of the estate in lieu of all or part of the money allowance authorized by this section, and in any case where the court makes an allowance in money, the surviving spouse shall be entitled to select and receive any personal property of the estate, of a value not exceeding the allowance in money, which shall be in lieu of and which value shall be credited against the allowance.

The allowance authorized by this law is the absolute property of the surviving spouse for these uses and shall be exempt from all claims and shall not be taken into the account of the administration of the estate of the intestate or seized upon any precept or execution.

In determining the amount to be allowed as a year's support, the court may, in its discretion, appoint freeholders to set aside that year's support, as previously required by law.

If the allowance set by the court as provided in this section is not satisfactory to the surviving spouse electing against the decedent's will, the surviving spouse of an intestate decedent, the unmarried minor children of an intestate decedent or the personal representative, then appeal may be made to the appropriate court in accordance with § 30-2-609. Proceedings on appeal shall be de novo without the intervention of a jury except when demand for a jury is made in accordance with Tennessee Rules of Civil Procedure, Rule 38; provided, that in jurisdictions where probate matters originate in a court whose judge is also a chancellor, the appeal shall be made as otherwise provided by law; and provided further, that in cases heard in a probate court whose judge is required to have the same qualifications as prescribed for circuit judges, the appeal shall also be made as otherwise provided by law.

Any action to set aside the property designated in this section shall be brought within the time limits set by § 31-4-102.

Acts 1967, ch. 146, § 1; 1969, ch. 135, § 3; impl. am. Acts 1976, ch. 529, § 1; T.C.A., § 30-803; Acts 1985, ch. 140, § 10; 1993, ch. 449, § 3; 1999, ch. 491, § 2.

Cross-References. Homestead, title 30, ch. 2, part 2.

Textbooks. Pritchard on Wills and Administration of Estates (4th ed., Phillips and Robinson), §§ 634, 638, 640, 644, 646, 816, 943, 1020, 1080.

Tennessee Forms (Robinson, Ramsey and Harwell), No. 4-1106.

Law Reviews.

Creditors' Rights and Security Transactions — 1954 Tennessee Survey, 7 Vand. L. Rev. 799 (1954).

Decedents' Estates, Trusts and Future Interests — 1964 Tennessee Survey (Herman L. Trautman), 18 Vand. L. Rev. 1185 (1965).

Inheritance and Gift Taxes — Revised (Steven A. Rajtor), 16 No. 2 Tenn. B.J. 24 (1980).

Insurance Proceeds in Trust (Troy Beatty, Jr.), 28 Tenn. L. Rev. 344 (1961).

Tax Consequences of Widow's Allowances, 18 Vand. L. Rev. 1652 (1965).

Tennessee Law and Equal Rights Amendment: Property Law, Employment Relations and Juries, 3 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 327 (1973).

Wrongful Death Actions in Tennessee (T.A. Smedley), 27 Tenn. L. Rev. 449 (1960).

Wrongful Death in Tennessee — New Solutions to Recurring Problems, 9 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 85 (1979).

30-2-103. Designation of beneficiary — Wages and debts owed deceased employee.

An employee may designate a beneficiary to receive payment for any wages or salary due such employee at the time of the employee's death.

The employer is encouraged to inform the employee of this right at the time the employee is hired.

If the employee fails to designate such beneficiary as provided for in subdivision (a)(1), the employer shall pay out such wages and salary according to subsection (b).

A sum not exceeding ten thousand dollars ($10,000) is authorized to be paid directly to the surviving spouse of a decedent, but if none, then to the surviving children of the decedent as tenants in common, as follows:

By an employer any wages or other compensation owed a deceased employee at the time of the employee's death;

By any other person owing, or holding funds for, a decedent if six (6) months have passed since the decedent's death without application having been made for the appointment of a personal representative. However, if such funds exceed ten thousand dollars ($10,000), the excess shall be paid to the personal representative or as otherwise ordered by the court.

All sums paid pursuant to this subsection (b) shall be charged against the elective share, homestead allowance, and year's support allowance as applicable. If one entitled to receive payment hereunder is a minor, the sum shall be paid to the guardian or custodian for the minor's benefit.

Acts 1967, ch. 146, § 1; 1969, ch. 135, § 4; 1971, ch. 291, § 1; impl. am. Acts 1976, ch. 529, § 1; T.C.A., § 30-804; Acts 1987, ch. 322, § 7; 1993, ch. 449, §§ 4, 5; 1995, ch. 182, § 1; 1997, ch. 426, § 4.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 1997, ch. 426, § 26 provided that this section shall apply to all estates of decedents dying on or after January 1, 1998, and to all wills, other documents and proceedings related thereto.

Textbooks. Pritchard on Wills and Administration of Estates (4th ed., Phillips and Robinson), §§ 660, 661.

Law Reviews.

Tennessee Law and Equal Rights Amendment: Property Law, Employment Relations and Juries, 3 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 327 (1973).

30-2-104. Death of surviving spouse or death, majority, or marriage of minor child during year.

Death of a surviving spouse within the one-year period for which the allowance is provided under § 30-2-102, for the surviving spouse's maintenance, shall not affect the vested right of the surviving spouse to the allowance or the ordering thereof by the court.

If an unmarried minor child dies, marries or comes of age, no allowance shall be made under § 30-2-102 for the minor's maintenance for any period after the child's death, marriage or coming of age.

Acts 1967, ch. 146, § 1; T.C.A., § 30-805.

Textbooks. Pritchard on Wills and Administration of Estates (4th ed., Phillips and Robinson), §§ 640, 641.

Collateral References.

Eligibility of illegitimate child to receive family allowance out of estate of his deceased father. 12 A.L.R.3d 1140.

Statutory family allowance to minor children as affected by previous agreement or judgment for their support. 6 A.L.R.3d 1387.

30-2-105. Administrator as trustee for children's allowance.

The administrator shall be trustee for the management of the property so set apart as the allowance for the children, until the appointment of a guardian, to whom the administrator shall pay it over, and take receipt.

Acts 1967, ch. 146, § 1; T.C.A., § 30-806.

Textbooks. Pritchard on Wills and Administration of Estates (4th ed., Phillips and Robinson), §§ 632, 640, 642.

Law Reviews.

Homestead in Tennessee (Mark J. Mayfield), 25 Tenn. L. Rev. 261 (1958).